Hawaii statutes.
§183D-2 Powers and duties of department.
The department shall:

(1) Manage and administer the wildlife and wildlife
resources of the State;

(2) Enforce all laws relating to the protecting,
taking, hunting, killing, propagating, or increasing the wildlife within the
State and the waters subject to its jurisdiction;

(3) Establish and maintain wildlife propagating
facility or facilities;

(4) Subject to the provisions of title 12, import
wildlife for the purpose of propagating and disseminating the same in the State
and the waters subject to its jurisdiction;

(5) Distribute, free of charge, as the department
deems to be in the public interest, game for the purpose of increasing the food
supply of the State; provided that when in the discretion of the department the
public interest will not be materially interfered with by so doing, the
department may propagate and furnish wildlife to private parties, upon such
reasonable terms, conditions, and prices as the department may determine;

(6) Ascertain, compile, and disseminate, free of
charge, information and advice as to the best methods of protecting,
propagating, and distributing wildlife in the State and the waters subject to
its jurisdiction;

(7) Gather and compile information and statistics
concerning the area, location, character, and increase and decrease of wildlife
in the State;

(8) Gather and compile information concerning
wildlife recommended for release in different localities, including the care
and propagation of wildlife for protective, productive, and aesthetic purposes
and other useful information, which the department deems proper;

(9) Have the power to manage and regulate all lands
which may be set apart as game management areas, public hunting areas, and
wildlife sanctuaries;

(10) Pursuant to section 183D-65 of this chapter,
destroy predators deemed harmful to wildlife;

(11) Formulate, and from time to time recommend to the
governor and legislature, such additional legislation necessary or desirable to
implement the objectives of title 12; and

(12) Preserve, protect, and promote public hunting. [L
1985, c 174, pt of §4; am L 1999, c 122, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next